Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 2 Precincts Using Paper Ballots

21-2-430.
Opening of ballot boxes; destruction of irrelevant materials; locking of ballot box; public breaking of seals; instruction cards and notices of penalties.

In precincts in which ballots are used, the poll officers shall, after taking the oath, publicly open the ballot boxes which have been furnished to them and shall, prior to opening of the polls, totally destroy any ballots and other papers which they may find therein which are not intended for use in such primary or election. When the polling place is opened, the ballot box shall be securely locked and shall not be opened until the close of the polls, as provided in Code Section 21-2-436. At the opening of the polls, the seals of the packages furnished by the superintendent shall be publicly broken and such packages shall be opened by the chief manager. The cards of instruction shall be immediately posted in each voting compartment. One card of instruction, one notice of penalties, and one voting rights poster shall be immediately posted in or about the voting room outside the enclosed space; and such card of instruction, notice of penalties, and voting rights poster shall be given to any elector at his or her request so long as there are any on hand.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1315, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 15; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 61/HB 244.

21-2-431.
Execution of voter’s certificate; procedure upon qualification of elector; elector unable to sign name; voting outside precinct of residence; registration as prerequisite to voting.

At every primary and election, each elector who desires to vote shall first execute a voter’s certificate and hand the same to the poll officer in charge of the electors list. When an elector has been found entitled to vote, the poll officer who examined his or her voter’s certificate shall sign his or her name or initials on the voter’s certificate and shall, if the voter’s signature is not readily legible, print such voter’s name under his or her signature. As each elector is found to be qualified and votes, the poll officers shall check off the elector’s name on the electors list and shall enter the number of the stub of the ballot issued to him or her, or his or her number in the order of admission to the voting machines, on the voter’s certificate of such elector. As each elector votes, his or her name in the order of voting shall be recorded in the numbered list of voters provided for that purpose.

If any elector was unable to sign his or her name at the time of registration or if, having been able to sign his or her name when registered, he or she subsequently shall have become, through physical disability, unable to sign his or her name when he or she applies to vote, he or she shall establish his or her identity to the satisfaction of the poll officers; and in such case he or she shall not be required to sign a voter’s certificate, but a certificate shall be prepared for him or her by a poll officer.

Except as provided in Code Sections 21-2-218 and 21-2-386, no person shall vote at any primary or election at any polling place outside the precinct in which such person resides, nor shall such person vote in the precinct in which such person resides unless such person has been registered as an elector and such person’s name appears on the electors list of such precinct.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 115, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 40; Civil Code 1910, § 40; Code 1933, § 34-110; Code 1933, § 34-1316, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 17; Ga. L. 1979, p. 962, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 888, § 7/HB 1435.

21-2-432.
Voter’s certificate binder as constituting official list of electors; separate preservation and disposition of refused applications.

After each elector has been admitted to vote, his or her voter’s certificate shall be inserted in the binder provided therefor by the registrars, and known as the “voter’s certificate binder,” and such voter’s certificates so bound shall constitute the official list of electors voting at such primary or election. All voter’s certificates prepared by persons applying to vote whose applications to vote are refused by the poll officers shall be separately preserved and returned to the superintendent with the other papers.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 429, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1311, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1317, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 9; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-433.
Admission of electors to enclosed space; detachment of ballots from stubs and distribution of ballots to electors; return of canceled ballots to superintendent.

No elector shall enter the enclosed space behind the guardrail provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-267 until he or she is found entitled to vote.

As soon as an elector has been admitted within the enclosed space, the poll officer having charge of the ballots in precincts in which ballots are used shall detach a ballot from the stub and give it to the elector, first folding it so that the words and figures printed on the face shall not be visible, and no ballots shall be deposited in the ballot box unless folded in the same manner. If an elector’s right to vote has been challenged for cause under Code Section 21-2-230, the elector shall be entitled to vote a challenged ballot. Not more than one ballot shall be detached from its stub in any book of ballots at any one time. Not more than one ballot shall be given to an elector; but, if an elector inadvertently spoils a ballot, such elector may obtain another upon returning the spoiled one. The ballots thus returned shall be immediately canceled and at the close of the polls shall be enclosed in an envelope, which shall be sealed and returned to the superintendent.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 97, § 4; Code 1933, § 34-1905; Ga. L. 1943, p. 290, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1313, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1318, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 12; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 32/SB 92.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Spoiled ballot definition, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.07.

21-2-434.
Restrictions as to removal of ballots from book or polling place; deposit of official ballots in box; disposition of unofficial ballots.

No official ballot shall be taken or detached from its stub in any book of ballots, except by a poll officer when a person desiring to vote has been found to be an elector entitled to vote. Not more than one ballot shall be removed at any one time or given to an elector, except in the case of a spoiled ballot as provided by this article. No person other than the poll officers shall take or remove any ballot from the polling place. Only official ballots shall be deposited in the ballot box and counted, except as otherwise provided in this article. If any ballot appears to have been obtained otherwise than from the superintendent as provided by this article, the same shall not be counted; and the chief manager shall transmit such ballot to the district attorney without delay, together with whatever information he or she may have regarding the same.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1318, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1320, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 19; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Spoiled ballot definition, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.07.

21-2-435.
Procedure as to marking and depositing of ballots.

In precincts in which ballots are used, the elector, after receiving his or her ballot, shall retire to one of the voting compartments and draw the curtain or shut the screen or door and shall then prepare his or her ballot; provided, however, that an elector may, before entering the voting booth, ask for instructions concerning the manner of voting, and a poll officer shall give him or her such instructions; but no person giving an elector such instructions shall in any manner request, suggest, or seek to persuade or induce any such elector to vote any particular ticket or for any particular candidate or for or against any particular question. After giving such instructions and before the elector closes the booth or votes, the poll officer shall retire and the elector shall forthwith vote.

At primaries, the elector shall prepare his or her ballot in the following manner: He or she shall vote for the candidates of his or her choice for nomination or election, according to the number of persons to be voted for by him or her, for each office, by making a cross (X) or check (π) mark in the square opposite the name of each candidate. No elector shall be permitted to cast a write-in ballot in a primary. A ballot upon which a voter has marked out or struck through the name of a candidate for whom the voter does not intend to cast his or her vote may be counted if the ballot clearly indicates that candidate for whom the voter desired to cast his or her vote.

At elections, the elector shall prepare his or her ballot in the following manner:

He or she may vote for the candidates of his or her choice for each office to be filled according to the number of persons to be voted for by him or her for each office, by making a cross (X) or check (π) mark in the square opposite the name of the candidate;

He or she may write, in the blank space provided therefor, any name not already printed on the ballot, and such insertion shall count as a vote without the marking of a cross (X) or check (π) mark;

Reserved;

If he or she desires to vote for the presidential electors nominated by any party or body, he or she may make a cross (X) or check (π) mark in the appropriate square at the left of the names of the candidates for President and Vice President of such party or body;

In case of a question submitted to the vote of the electors, he or she may make a cross (X) or check (π) mark in the appropriate square opposite the answer which he or she desires to give.

Before leaving the voting compartment, the elector shall fold his or her ballot, without displaying the markings thereon, in the same way it was folded when received by him or her; and he or she shall then leave the compartment and exhibit the number strip of the ballot to a poll officer who shall ascertain by an inspection of the number appearing thereon whether the ballot so exhibited to him or her is the same ballot which the elector received before entering the voting compartment. If it is the same, the poll officer shall direct the elector, without unfolding the ballot, to remove the perforated portion containing the number, and the elector shall immediately deposit the ballot in the ballot box. The number strip shall be deposited in the stub box provided for such purpose and the number strips shall be retained with the ballots and other stubs. Any ballot, other than one which has been challenged for cause under Code Section 21-2-230, deposited in a ballot box at any primary or election without having such number removed shall be void and shall not be counted.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 324, § 2; Code 1933, § 34-1314, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 851, § 7; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, § 12; Code 1933, § 34-1319, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 13; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 325, § 10; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 33/SB 92.

21-2-436.
Duties of poll officers after the close of the polls.

After the polls are closed and the last elector has voted in precincts in which ballots are used, at least two poll officers shall remain within the enclosed space. Before the ballot box is opened, the number of ballots issued to electors, as shown by the stubs, and the number of ballots, if any, spoiled and returned by electors and canceled, shall be announced to all present in the voting room and entered upon the general returns of votes cast at such primary or election. The poll officer shall then compare the number of electors voting as shown by the stubs with the number of names shown as voting by the electors list, voter’s certificates, and the numbered list of voters, and shall announce the result, and shall enter on the general returns the number of electors who have voted, as shown by the voter’s certificates. If any differences exist, they shall be reconciled, if possible; otherwise, they shall be noted on the general returns. The electors list, the voter’s certificates, the numbered list of voters, and the stubs of all ballots used, together with all unused ballots, all spoiled and canceled ballots, and all rejected voter’s certificates, shall then be placed in separate packages, containers, or envelopes and sealed before the ballot box is opened.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1320, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1321, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 21; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 27; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Interfering with poll officers, §

21-2-569

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Spoiled ballot definition, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.07.

21-2-437.
Procedure as to count and return of votes generally; void ballots.

After the polls close and as soon as all the ballots have been properly accounted for and those outside the ballot box as well as the voter’s certificates, numbered list of voters, and electors list have been sealed, the poll officers shall open the ballot box and take therefrom all ballots contained therein. In primaries in which more than one ballot box is used, any ballots or stubs belonging to another party holding its primary in the same polling place shall be returned to the ballot box for the party for which they were issued. In primaries, separate tally and return sheets shall be prepared for each party, and separate poll officers shall be designated by the chief manager to count and tally each party’s ballot. Where the same ballot box is being used by one or more parties, the ballots and stubs shall first be divided by party before being tallied and counted. The ballots shall then be counted one by one and a record made of the total number. Then the chief manager, together with such assistant managers and other poll officers as the chief manager may designate, under the scrutiny of one of the assistant managers and in the presence of the other poll officers, shall read aloud the names of the candidates marked or written upon each ballot, together with the office for which the person named is a candidate, and the answers contained on the ballots to the questions submitted, if any; and the other assistant manager and clerks shall carefully enter each vote as read and keep account of the same in ink on a sufficient number of tally papers, all of which shall be made at the same time. All ballots, after being removed from the box, shall be kept within the unobstructed view of all persons in the voting room until replaced in the box. No person, while handling the ballots, shall have in his or her hand any pencil, pen, stamp, or other means of marking or spoiling any ballot. The poll officers shall immediately proceed to canvass and compute the votes cast and shall not adjourn or postpone the canvass or computation until it shall have been fully completed.

When the vote cast for the different persons named upon the ballots and upon the questions, if any, appearing thereon, shall have been fully recorded in the tally papers and counted, the poll officers shall duly certify to the number of votes cast for each person and question and shall prepare in ink a sufficient number of general returns. The general returns shall show, in addition to the entries made thereon as aforesaid, the total number of ballots received from the superintendent, the number of ballots cast, the number of ballots declared void, the number of ballots spoiled and canceled, and any blank ballots cast, as well as the votes cast for each candidate. At elections, the number of votes cast for each candidate by each political party or body of which such candidate is a nominee shall be separately stated.

In returning any votes cast for any person whose name is not printed on the ballot, the poll officers shall record any such names exactly as they were written on the ballot.

Any ballot marked so as to identify the voter shall be void and not counted, except a ballot cast by a challenged elector whose name appears on the electors list; such challenged vote shall be counted as prima facie valid but may be voided in the event of an election contest. Any ballot marked by anything but pen or pencil shall be void and not counted. Any erasure, mutilation, or defect in the vote for any candidate shall render void the vote for such candidate but shall not invalidate the votes cast on the remainder of the ballot, if otherwise properly marked. If an elector shall mark his or her ballot for more persons for any nomination or office than there are candidates to be voted for such nomination or office, or if, for any reason, it may be impossible to determine his or her choice for any nomination or office, his or her ballot shall not be counted for such nomination or office; but the ballot shall be counted for all nominations or offices for which it is properly marked. Unmarked ballots or ballots improperly or defectively marked so that the whole ballot is void shall be set aside and shall be preserved with other ballots. In primaries, votes cast for candidates who have died, withdrawn, or been disqualified shall be void and shall not be counted. Except as provided in subsection (g) of Code Section 21-2-134 regarding nonpartisan elections, in elections, votes for candidates who have died or been disqualified shall be void and shall not be counted.

Any ballot marked by any other mark than a cross (X) or check (π) mark in the spaces provided for that purpose shall be void and not counted; provided, however, that no vote recorded thereon shall be declared void because a cross (X) or check (π) mark thereon is irregular in form. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, if the voter has marked his or her ballot in such a manner that he or she has indicated clearly and without question the candidate which he or she desires to receive his or her vote, his or her ballot shall be counted and such candidate shall receive his vote.

At elections, a ballot indicating a write-in vote for any person whose name is not printed on the ballot and who properly gave notice of intent to run as a write-in candidate pursuant to Code Section 21-2-133 shall be counted as a vote for such person, if written in the proper space or spaces provided for that purpose, whether or not a cross (X) or check (π) mark is placed before the name of such person.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1234; Code 1868, § 1315; Code 1873, § 1288; Code 1882, § 1288; Civil Code 1895, § 72; Civil Code 1910, § 82; Code 1933, § 34-1303; Code 1933, § 34-1321, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 656, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1322, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 22; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 24; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 311, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 325, § 11; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 37/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, deleted “, except that, in the discretion of the superintendent, the poll officers may stop the counting after all contested races and questions are counted, provided that the results of these contested races and questions are posted for the information of the public outside the polling place and the ballots are returned to the ballot box and deposited with the superintendent until counting is resumed on the following day” at the end of subsection (a); and substituted “Except as provided in subsection (g) of Code Section 21-2-134 regarding nonpartisan elections, in elections” for “In elections” at the beginning of the last sentence of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Spoiled ballot definition, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.07.

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-438.
Ballots identifying voter, not marked, or improperly marked declared void.

Any ballot marked so as to identify the voter shall be void and not counted, except a ballot cast by a challenged elector whose name appears on the electors list; such challenged vote shall be counted as prima facie valid but may be voided in the event of an election contest. Any ballot marked by anything but pen or pencil shall be void and not counted. Any erasure, mutilation, or defect in the vote for any candidate shall render void the vote for such candidate but shall not invalidate the votes cast on the remainder of the ballot, if otherwise properly marked. If an elector shall mark his or her ballot for more persons for any nomination or office than there are candidates to be voted for such nomination or office, or if, for any reason, it may be impossible to determine his or her choice for any nomination or office, his or her ballot shall not be counted for such nomination or office; but the ballot shall be counted for all nominations or offices for which it is properly marked. Ballots not marked or improperly or defectively marked so that the whole ballot is void shall be set aside and shall be preserved with the other ballots. In primaries, votes cast for candidates who have died, withdrawn, or been disqualified shall be void and shall not be counted. Except as provided in subsection (g) of Code Section 21-2-134 regarding nonpartisan elections, in elections, votes for candidates who have died or been disqualified shall be void and shall not be counted.

At elections, any ballot marked by any other mark than a cross (X) or check (π) mark in the spaces provided for that purpose shall be void and not counted; provided, however, that no vote recorded thereon shall be declared void because a cross (X) or check (π) mark thereon is irregular in form. A cross (X) or check (π) mark in the square opposite the names of the nominees of a political party or body for the offices of President and Vice President shall be counted as a vote for every candidate of that party or body for the offices of presidential electors. Any ballot indicating a write-in for any person whose name is not printed on the ballot and who properly gave notice of intent to run as a write-in candidate pursuant to Code Section 21-2-133 shall be counted as a vote for such person, if written in the proper space or spaces provided for that purpose, whether or not a cross (X) or check (π) mark is placed before the name of such person.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary and in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Election Board promulgated pursuant to paragraph (7) of Code Section 21-2-31, if the elector has marked his or her ballot in such a manner that he or she has indicated clearly and without question the candidate for whom he or she desires to cast his or her vote, his or her ballot shall be counted and such candidate shall receive his or her vote, notwithstanding the fact that the elector in indicating his or her choice may have marked his or her ballot in a manner other than as prescribed by this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 304, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 34-1322, 34-1322.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, §§ 9, 10; Code 1933, §§ 34-1323, 34-1324, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, §§ 9, 24; Ga. L. 1987, p. 417, § 8; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 17; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 50; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 38/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, substituted “Except as provided in subsection (g) of Code Section 21-2-134 regarding nonpartisan elections, in elections” for “In elections” at the beginning of the last sentence in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Definition of vote, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Returns of Primaries and Elections, § 183-1-15-.02.

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-439.
Decisions concerning questionable marks or defaced or mutilated ballots.

Decisions concerning questionable marks on ballots or defacing or mutilation of ballots and the count to be recorded thereon shall be made by the assistant managers; and, if they disagree, the chief manager shall make the decision.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1323, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1325, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 25; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Definition of vote, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Returns of Primaries and Elections, § 183-1-15-.02.